Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-250
Act, how cited.

Sections 2-250 to 2-273 shall be known and may be cited as the County Agricultural Society Act.

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 20.